Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5635XC (1) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 48A.33A Verification of 1 citizenship. 2 Prior to registering a registrant to vote, the registrar 3 shall attempt to verify the registrantâs United States 4 citizenship using the systematic alien verification for 5 entitlements system of the United States citizenship and 6 immigration services. The registrar shall not register the 7 registrant to vote if the registrar is unable to verify the 8 United States citizenship of the registrant. The registrant 9 may appeal the registrarâs decision to the district court in 10 the registrarâs county, and the decision of the court shall be 11 final. 12